Vermont, session 2025-2026, H651.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 248(b) is amended to read:
(b) Before the Public Utility Commission issues a certificate of public good
as required under subsection (a) of this section, it shall find that the purchase,
investment, or construction:
* * *
(5) With respect to an in-state facility, will not have an undue adverse
effect on aesthetics, historic sites, air and water purity, the natural
environment, the use of natural resources, and the public health and safety,
VT LEG #386328 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.651
2026 Page 2 of 2
with due consideration having been given to the criteria specified in 10 V.S.A.
§§ 1424a(d) and 6086(a)(1) through (8) 6086(a)(1)–(8) and (9)(K), impacts to
primary agricultural soils as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001, and greenhouse gas
impacts.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386328 v.1